Missouri, session 2026, HB2923.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.115, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
2 thereof, to be known as sections 137.115 and 137.1081, to read as follows:
137.115. 1. (1) All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
2 assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
3 make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
4 town or district.
5 (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section 137.078,
6 the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third percent of
7 its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year.
8 (3) The assessor shall annually assess all real property, including any new
9 construction and improvements to real property that are not exempt under section
10 137.1081, and possessory interests in real property at the percent of its true value in money
11 set in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of any possessory interest in real
12 property in subclass (3), where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate airport
13 boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a
14 commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political subdivision,
15 shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such possessory interest in real
16 property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
17 subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such real property completed
18 after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned possessory interest,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2923 2
19 regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or whether such costs were
20 considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property in the
21 following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January first of each odd-
22 numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same assessed values shall
23 apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction and property
24 improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of January first of
25 the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place of doing
26 business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and require the
27 person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
28 person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county.
29 (4) On or before January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare
30 and submit a two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the
31 state tax commission for their respective approval or modification. The county governing
32 body shall approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the state tax
33 commission by February first. If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
34 alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall
35 be considered approved by the county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
36 approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
37 county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share
38 funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative
39 hearing commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment
40 maintenance plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
41 proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision
42 of the administrative hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit
43 court of the county involved.
44 (5) In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county with a
45 charter form of government, or within a city not within a county, is made by a computer,
46 computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported by clear,
47 convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the assessor at any
48 hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
49 presumption that the assessment was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
50 computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
51 [(1)] (a) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by
52 generally accepted appraisal techniques; and
53 [(2)] (b) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and
54 the address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
55 that:

HCS HB 2923 3
56 [(a)] a. Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and
57 [(b)] b. Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed
58 property, except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
59 the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred
60 square feet in size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor
61 plan, number of rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
62 2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
63 property assessment forms through the mail.
64 3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
65 of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
66 the following percentages of their true value in money:
67 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
68 one percent;
69 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
70 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
71 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
72 motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years
73 old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
74 hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
75 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
76 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
77 retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
78 to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
79 identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
80 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
81 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
82 materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
83 described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
84 producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
85 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
86 property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,
87 shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
88 then be delivered to the assessor.
89 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
90 (b) of Article X of the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016, shall be assessed
91 at the following percentages of true value:
92 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;

HCS HB 2923 4
93 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and
94 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
95 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
96 then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
97 or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
98 provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
99 he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
100 tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
101 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
102 dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
103 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
104 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
105 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
106 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
107 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
108 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
109 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is
110 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
111 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
112 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
113 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
114 may be considered real property.
115 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
116 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
117 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
118 to the existing real estate parcel.
119 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
120 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
121 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
122 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the
123 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
124 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.
125 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
126 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
127 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
128 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
129 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax commission shall select and make

HCS HB 2923 5
130 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and
131 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
132 issue of the publication selected by the state tax commission. The assessor shall not use a
133 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
134 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
135 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
136 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
137 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
138 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
139 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
140 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
141 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
142 was properly assessed in the previous year.
143 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass
144 (1) real property by more than fifteen percent since the last assessment, excluding increases
145 due to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of
146 such property.
147 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
148 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
149 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
150 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
151 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days to
152 notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
153 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection 10 of this section, shall include,
154 but not be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior portions of the
155 land and any buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably and
156 lawfully gain external access, and shall include an observation and review of the interior of
157 any buildings or improvements on the property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant
158 to subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or
159 the like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as required by
160 this section.
161 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
162 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
163 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
164 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
165 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making

HCS HB 2923 6
166 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
167 such electronic payment.
168 14. Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
169 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
170 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
171 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
172 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
173 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
174 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
175 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
176 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
177 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
178 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
179 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
180 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
181 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
182 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
183 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
184 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
185 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
186 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
187 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
188 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
189 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general
190 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
191 any year.
192 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
193 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
194 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
195 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such
196 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and
197 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
198 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
199 16. Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
200 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
201 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
202 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state tax

HCS HB 2923 7
203 commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of tax
204 policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
205 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
206 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
207 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
208 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
209 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
210 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.1081. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Homestead
2 Improvement Property Tax Relief Act".
3 2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
4 (1) "Catastrophic event", a sudden and unexpected occurrence resulting in
5 significant damage or destruction of a dwelling including, but not limited to, fire,
6 explosion, tornado, flood, storm, earthquake, or other natural or manmade disaster;
7 (2) "Completion of the improvement", the earlier of:
8 (a) The date a certificate of occupancy or similar authorization for occupancy is
9 issued by the appropriate local government; or
10 (b) In jurisdictions where no such certificate is issued, the date on which the
11 dwelling, as improved, is first suitable for occupancy in the judgment of the assessor;
12 (3) "Homestead property", real property in this state that:
13 (a) Is improved with not more than four dwelling units;
14 (b) Is used as the principal residence of at least one of the owners of record; and
15 (c) Contains no more than five acres of land or such greater acreage as is
16 reasonably necessary for residential use as determined by the assessor consistent with
17 state tax commission rules;
18 (4) "Improvement" or "qualifying improvement":
19 (a) Any reconstruction, alteration, addition, or new construction to an existing
20 homestead property or its attached structures that:
21 a. Is not ordinary maintenance or repair; and
22 b. Exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars in a calendar year for all such
23 projects combined;
24 (b) Includes, but is not limited to, reconstruction or replacement of a dwelling
25 damaged or destroyed by a catastrophic event, provided the requirements of subsection
26 7 of this section are satisfied;
27 (c) Shall not be construed to include:
28 a. The construction of a new dwelling on an existing site; or

HCS HB 2923 8
29 b. The replacement of an entire dwelling with a new dwelling on the same site
30 unless the replacement occurs after a catastrophic event as provided in subsection 7 of
31 this section;
32 (5) "Improvement value", the portion of the true value in money of the
33 improvements on the homestead property that is attributable solely to a qualifying
34 improvement and that exceeds the preimprovement base value, as determined under
35 state tax commission rules adopted under this section;
36 (6) "Ordinary maintenance or repair", work that does not exceed seven
37 thousand five hundred dollars in a calendar year for all such projects combined;
38 (7) "Owner", a Missouri resident who:
39 (a) Is an owner of record of homestead property or has a legal or equitable
40 interest in such property as evidenced by a written instrument; and
41 (b) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on such homestead property;
42 (8) "Preimprovement base value", the true value in money of the buildings and
43 structures on the homestead property as of January first of the tax year immediately
44 preceding the commencement of a qualifying improvement, as finally equalized and
45 certified, exclusive of land value.
46 3. (1) Subject to the conditions and limitations of this section, for each tax year
47 of the exemption period established in this section, there shall be exempt from ad
48 valorem taxation the improvement value of a qualifying improvement to homestead
49 property. Such exemption shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars in true value in
50 money for any one homestead property.
51 (2) The exemption shall apply only to the improvement value and shall not
52 reduce:
53 (a) The preimprovement base value of the dwelling; or
54 (b) The true value in money of the land.
55 (3) The exemption shall be applied in determining assessed value by subtracting
56 the exempt improvement value from the total true value in money of the improved
57 homestead property, then applying the applicable assessment ratio to the remaining true
58 value in money.
59 4. (1) The exemption provided in this section shall apply uniformly to all
60 political subdivisions in this state. No political subdivision shall:
61 (a) Deny the exemption to property otherwise eligible under this section;
62 (b) Impose additional local restrictions or conditions on eligibility. This
63 paragraph shall not be construed to:
64 a. Prohibit a political subdivision from adopting zoning ordinances or building
65 codes under state law;

HCS HB 2923 9
66 b. Prohibit a homeowners' association from adopting reasonable rules under
67 state law; or
68 c. Nullify zoning ordinances, building codes, or reasonable rules of a
69 homeowners' association adopted before the effective date of this section; or
70 (c) Reduce the amount or duration of the exemption.
71 (2) To be eligible for the exemption, all of the following shall be satisfied:
72 (a) The property is homestead property on:
73 a. The date the construction of the qualifying improvement commences; and
74 b. January first of each tax year for which the exemption is claimed;
75 (b) The owner of the homestead property has filed a timely notice of intent and
76 application as provided in this section; and
77 (c) The improvement is a qualifying improvement and not ordinary maintenance
78 or repair, as determined under this section and state tax commission rules.
79 (3) The exemption shall attach to the homestead property and, once granted,
80 shall continue for the remainder of the exemption period notwithstanding any
81 subsequent transfer of title so long as the property continues to be used as homestead
82 property.
83 5. (1) Prior to issuance of a building permit for a qualifying improvement or,
84 where no permit is required, within sixty days after commencement of construction, the
85 owner of homestead property seeking the exemption shall file with the assessor a
86 homestead improvement exemption intent form prescribed by the state tax commission.
87 Such form shall include:
88 (a) A legal description and parcel identification number of the property;
89 (b) The name and mailing address of all owners of record;
90 (c) A brief description of the proposed improvement;
91 (d) The estimated cost of the improvement;
92 (e) An affirmation that the property is used, and will continue to be used, as
93 homestead property; and
94 (f) Such other information as the state tax commission may reasonably require.
95 (2) (a) The assessor shall review the intent form, determine eligibility, and notify
96 the owner in writing of approval or denial.
97 (b) No assessor shall deny preapproval for a project based on information on an
98 intent form unless the form consists of inadequate documentation or the form shows the
99 estimated cost of the improvement is seven thousand five hundred dollars or less.
100 (c) The burden of proof for a denial of preapproval shall be on the assessor.
101 (d) Denial shall state specific reasons and shall be subject to the same appeal
102 procedures as other assessment determinations under chapter 138.

HCS HB 2923 10
103 (3) (a) Within one hundred eighty days after completion of the improvement,
104 the owner shall submit to the assessor a homestead improvement exemption form
105 prescribed by the state tax commission. Such form shall:
106 a. Affirm that the improvement described in the preconstruction notice has been
107 completed; and
108 b. Request application of the exemption to the homestead property.
109 (b) The owner shall attach to the form copies of the building permit, certificate
110 of occupancy or equivalent documentation, the final cost of the improvement, and any
111 other documents reasonably requested by the assessor or required by state tax
112 commission rule.
113 (c) The assessor shall approve such exemption unless the exemption form
114 consists of inadequate documentation or the form shows the final cost of the
115 improvement is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars.
116 (4) (a) Failure to file the preconstruction notice within the time prescribed shall
117 not automatically bar the exemption, but the assessor may reduce the exemption period
118 by up to one tax year for late filing, as provided by state tax commission rule.
119 (b) In no event shall an application be accepted more than two years after
120 completion of the improvement.
121 6. (1) For qualifying improvements, the exemption shall apply for four
122 consecutive tax years, beginning with the first tax year for which the improvement is
123 first reflected in the assessment of the homestead property, provided that the property
124 remains homestead property on January first of each such year.
125 (2) The exemption shall terminate prior to the expiration of the four-year period
126 upon the earliest of:
127 (a) The property ceasing to be used as homestead property;
128 (b) Removal or destruction of the improvement other than by a catastrophic
129 event; or
130 (c) Voluntary written relinquishment of the exemption by the owner.
131 (3) (a) Upon termination, the improvement value shall be fully taxable in the
132 next ensuing tax year, subject to general reassessment practices.
133 (b) No assessor shall reassess such homestead property in such a way to recover
134 revenues lost during the exemption period. The reassessment of such homestead
135 property shall be based on the true value in money of such property.
136 7. (1) If a dwelling used as homestead property is damaged or destroyed, in
137 whole or in part, as the result of a catastrophic event:
138 (a) The preevent true value in money of the improvements shall continue to be
139 used as the preimprovement base value during the tax year in which the catastrophic

HCS HB 2923 11
140 event occurs, subject to adjustment under general law for unusable or uninhabitable
141 structures, and the assessor shall make such interim adjustments as may be required by
142 state tax commission rules; and
143 (b) If the owner reconstructs, repairs, or replaces the damaged dwelling on the
144 same parcel within three years of the catastrophic event, such reconstruction, repair, or
145 replacement shall be treated as a qualifying improvement under this section and the
146 resulting improvement value not exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars for an insured
147 dwelling or two hundred thousand dollars for an uninsured dwelling shall be exempt for
148 a four-year exemption period as provided in this section.
149 (2) The owner shall file a preconstruction notice and application in the same
150 manner as other qualifying improvements, provided that the assessor may accept a
151 consolidated filing covering both the catastrophic event and the subsequent
152 reconstruction.
153 (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the assessor from
154 recognizing a temporary reduction in value for property rendered uninhabitable by a
155 catastrophic event as otherwise authorized by law.
156 8. (1) For purposes of determining improvement value under this section, the
157 assessor shall:
158 (a) Establish the preimprovement base value of the homestead property;
159 (b) Determine the total true value in money of the improvements on the
160 homestead property as of January first of the first tax year for which the improvement
161 is first fully reflected in the assessment; and
162 (c) Attribute to improvement value the portion of such total improvement value
163 that is reasonably attributable to the qualifying improvement and that exceeds the
164 preimprovement base value, consistent with uniform methodologies set by the state tax
165 commission.
166 (2) (a) The state tax commission shall adopt rules, regulations, and standard
167 forms necessary to implement and administer this section including, but not limited to:
168 a. An annual statement, submitted to the assessor in December of each year in
169 which improvements occur, from a taxpayer improving such homestead property
170 indicating the percentage of completion of the improvement;
171 b. Detailed criteria distinguishing qualifying improvements from ordinary
172 maintenance and repair;
173 c. Standard methods and worksheets for determining improvement value;
174 d. Procedures for handling partial completion of improvements, phased
175 construction, and combined maintenance and improvement projects;

HCS HB 2923 12
176 e. Guidance to ensure uniform statewide application of the exemption by all
177 assessors; and
178 f. Procedures for late applications, corrections, and abatements consistent with
179 existing appeal and correction mechanisms.
180 (b) All rules promulgated under this section shall be designed to promote:
181 a. Administrative simplicity and transparency for taxpayers;
182 b. Uniform application and equal treatment of similarly situated properties
183 statewide; and
184 c. Accurate separation of normal market appreciation from value attributable to
185 qualifying improvements.
186 (c) Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
187 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
188 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
189 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
190 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
191 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
192 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
193 effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
194 9. (1) The homestead improvement exemption created by this section shall be in
195 addition to any other homestead, senior citizen, disability, or property tax relief
196 program authorized by state law. In no event shall such exemption be construed to
197 reduce or eliminate any exemption or credit otherwise available to a taxpayer. For
198 purposes of calculating an owner's real property tax liability under sections 137.1050
199 and 137.1055, improvements that qualify for an exemption under this section shall not
200 be construed to be new construction and improvements that increase the real property
201 tax liability attributable to new construction and improvements.
202 (2) To the extent of any conflict between this section and any local ordinance,
203 resolution, or charter provision, this section shall control and such local provision shall
204 be of no force or effect with respect to homestead improvement valuation and
205 exemption.
206 (3) The exemption created in this section shall apply to qualifying improvements
207 for which construction commences on or after January first following the effective date
208 of this section.
209 10. As required in Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, the
210 general assembly shall make an appropriation each year to provide for restitution to the

HCS HB 2923 13
211 respective political subdivisions of revenues lost, if any, by reason of the exemption
212 created in this section.
✔